Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Article 8. Foreign Limited Partnerships.

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 787.

Sec. 32.11.410.
Law governing.

Subject to the Constitution of the State of Alaska,

the laws of the state under which a foreign limited partnership is organized govern its organization and internal affairs and the liability of its limited partners; and

a foreign limited partnership may not be denied registration by reason of a difference between those laws and the laws of this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.420.
Registration required.

Before transacting business in this state, a foreign limited partnership shall register with the department. In order to register, a foreign limited partnership shall submit to the department an original and an exact copy of an application for registration as a foreign limited partnership, signed and sworn to by a general partner and setting out

the name of the foreign limited partnership and, if different, the name under which it proposes to register and transact business in this state;

the state and date of its formation;

the name and address of an agent for service of process on the foreign limited partnership whom the foreign limited partnership elects to appoint; the agent must be an individual resident of this state, a domestic corporation, or a foreign corporation having a place of business in, and authorized to do business in, this state;

a statement that the commissioner is appointed the agent of the foreign limited partnership for service of process if an agent has not been appointed under (3) of this section or, if appointed, the agent’s authority has been revoked or if the agent cannot be found or served with the exercise of reasonable diligence;

the address of the office required to be maintained in the state of its organization by the laws of that state or, if not so required, of the principal office of the foreign limited partnership;

the name and business address of each general partner; and

the address of the office at which is kept a list of the names and addresses of the limited partners and their capital contributions, together with an undertaking by the foreign limited partnership to keep those records until the foreign limited partnership’s registration in this state is cancelled or withdrawn.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 18 ch 87 SLA 1994)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”

Sec. 32.11.430.
Issuance of registration.

If the department finds that an application for registration conforms to law and all requisite fees have been paid, the department shall

endorse on the application the word “Filed,” and the month, day, and year of the filing;

file in the department the original of the application; and

issue a certificate of registration to transact business in this state.

The certificate of registration, together with an exact copy of the application, shall be returned to the person who filed the application or the person’s representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.440.
Name.

A foreign limited partnership may register with the department under any name, whether or not it is the name under which it is registered in its state of organization, that includes without abbreviation the words “limited partnership” and that could be registered by a domestic limited partnership.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.450.
Correction of statements in registration application.

If a statement in the application for registration of a foreign limited partnership was false when made or arrangements or other facts described have changed, making the application inaccurate, the foreign limited partnership shall promptly file with the department a certificate, signed and sworn to by a general partner, correcting the statement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.460.
Cancellation of registration.

A foreign limited partnership may cancel its registration by filing with the department a certificate of cancellation signed and sworn to by a general partner. A cancellation does not terminate the authority of the commissioner to accept service of process on the foreign limited partnership with respect to causes of action arising out of the transactions of business in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.470.
Transaction of business without registration.

A foreign limited partnership transacting business in this state may not maintain an action, suit, or proceeding in a court of this state until it has registered in this state.

The failure of a foreign limited partnership to register in this state does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the foreign limited partnership or prevent the foreign limited partnership from defending an action, suit, or proceeding in a court of this state.

A limited partner of a foreign limited partnership is not liable as a general partner of the foreign limited partnership solely by reason of having transacted business in this state without registration.

A foreign limited partnership, by transacting business in this state without registration, appoints the commissioner as its agent for service of process with respect to causes of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.480.
Action by department.

The department may bring an action to restrain a foreign limited partnership from transacting business in this state in violation of AS

32.11.410

—

32.11.480

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)